apertium-eo-en.eo.dix.xml
<pardef n="ĥ">
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>hx</l>                  <r>ĥ</r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ĥ</l>                   <r>ĥ</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="k_ĥ">
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>hx</l>                  <r>k</r></p></e>
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ĥ</l>                   <r>k</r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>k</l>                   <r>k</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ĵ">
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>jx</l>                  <r>ĵ</r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ĵ</l>                   <r>ĵ</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ŝ">
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>sx</l>                  <r>ŝ</r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ŝ</l>                   <r>ŝ</r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ŭ">
<e r="LR">                    <p><l>ux</l>                  <r>ŭ</r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ŭ</l>                   <r>ŭ</r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="adj__adj">
<e>                           <p><l>a</l>                   <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aj</l>                  <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>an</l>                  <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ajn</l>                 <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

    <!-- Hack -->

<e r="RL">                    <p><l>a</l>                   <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>aj</l>                  <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>an</l>                  <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>ajn</l>                 <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>a</l>                   <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>aj</l>                  <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>an</l>                  <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>ajn</l>                 <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>a</l>                   <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>aj</l>                  <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>an</l>                  <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>ajn</l>                 <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="plur/a__det">
<e>                           <p><l>a</l>                   <r>a<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>aj</l>                  <r>a<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>an</l>                  <r>a<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ajn</l>                 <r>a<s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="komence__adv">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kie__rel">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="post_kiam__rel">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="kial__adv">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vere__preadv">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="and__cnjcoo">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="after__cnjadv">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="ke__cnjsub">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="cnjsub"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="at__pr">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ĉiu__prn">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>j</l>                   <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>jn</l>                  <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>j</l>                   <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tio__prn">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>j</l>                   <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>jn</l>                  <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>





<pardef n="nom__n">
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>j</l>                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>n</l>                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>jn</l>                  <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="nommf__n">
<e>                           <p><l>o</l>                   <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>oj</l>                  <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ino</l>                 <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inoj</l>                <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>on</l>                  <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ojn</l>                 <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inon</l>                <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>inojn</l>               <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

<!-- kiam genro mankas, ni elektas la o-formojn -->
<e>                           <p><l>o</l>                   <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>oj</l>                  <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>on</l>                  <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ojn</l>                 <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<!--
Necesas difini paradigmon por adj-nomo terminoj

<e lm="iom">                  <i>iom</i><par n="vere__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="tiel">                 <i>tiel</i><par n="vere__preadv"/></e>
<e>                           <i>iu<b/>ajn</i><par n="vere__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="ĉiufoje kiam">         <par n="ĉ"/><i>iufoje<b/>kiam</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ĉio">                  <par n="ĉ"/><i>io</i><par n="ĉiu__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ĉiu">                  <par n="ĉ"/><i>iu</i><par n="ĉiu__prn"/></e>
<e lm="tiu">                  <i>tiu</i><par n="tio__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ĉi tiu"><par n="ĉ"/><p><l>i<b/>tiu</l><r>i<b/>tiu<par n="tio__prn"/></r></p></e>
<e lm="tio">                  <i>tio</i><par n="tio__prn"/></e>
<e lm="en">                   <i>en</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="kaj ankaŭ">            <i>kaj<b/>ankaŭ</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="antaŭ">                <i>kaj<b/>anta</i><par n="ŭ"/><i></i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="ke">                   <i>ke</i><par n="ke__cnjsub"/></e>
<e lm="kial">                 <i>kial</i><par n="kial__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kiam">                 <i>kiam</i><par n="kial__adv"/></e>
<e lm="kie">                  <i>kie</i><par n="kie__rel"/></e>
<e lm="kiel">                 <i>kiel</i><par n="kial__adv"/></e>
<e lm="post kiam">            <i>post<b/>kiam</i><par n="post_kiam__rel"/></e>
<e lm="kune kun">             <i>kune<b/>kun</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="nek">                  <i>nek</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="plura">                <i>plur</i><par n="plur/a__det"/></e>
<e lm="sed prefere">          <i>sed<b/>prefere</i><par n="and__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="sen">                  <i>sen</i><par n="at__pr"/></e>
<e lm="tamen">                <i>tamen</i><par n="after__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="poeto">                <i>poet</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="monakejo">             <i>mona</i><par n="k_ĥ"/><i>ejo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="specife">              <i>specife</i><par n="komence__adv"/></e>
<e lm="laŭpaŝa">              <i>la</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>pa</i><par n="ŝ"/><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="eĥi">                  <i>e</i><par n="ĥ"/><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="superulo">             <i>superulo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="arkeologio">           <i>ar</i><par n="k_ĥ"/><i>eologio</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="aŭkciisto">            <i>a</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>kciist</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="enmaŝigi">             <i>enma</i><par n="ŝ"/><i>ig</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tondaĵo">              <i>tonda</i><par n="ĵ"/><i>o</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="kulture">              <i>kulture</i><par n="komence__adv"/></e>
<e lm="nesukcesa">            <i>nesukces</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gitaristo">            <i>gitarist</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
<e lm="gelatenaĵo">           <i>gelatena</i><par n="ĵ"/><i>o</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="masoĥismo">            <i>maso</i><par n="ĥ"/><i>ismo</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="konkursero">           <i>konkursero</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="mekanizado">           <i>me</i><par n="k_ĥ"/><i>anizado</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="kontraŭnaturaĵo">      <i>kontra</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>natura</i><par n="ĵ"/><i>o</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="afiŝo">                <i>afi</i><par n="ŝ"/><i>o</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="kelktempe">            <i>kelktempe</i><par n="komence__adv"/></e>
<e lm="malgravaĵo">           <i>malgrava</i><par n="ĵ"/><i>o</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="ĉeĥa">                 <par n="ĉ"/><i>e</i><par n="ĥ"/><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kinematografia">       <i>kinematografi</i><par n="adj__adj"/></e>
<e lm="repuŝataki">           <i>repu</i><par n="ŝ"/><i>atak</i><par n="verb__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="miskompreniĝo">        <i>miskompreni</i><par n="ĝ"/><i>o</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="kontraŭnature">        <i>kontra</i><par n="ŭ"/><i>nature</i><par n="komence__adv"/></e>
<e lm="paroĥano">             <i>paro</i><par n="ĥ"/><i>ano</i><par n="nom__n"/></e>
<e lm="ŝtelĉasisto">          <par n="ŝ"/><i>tel</i><par n="ĉ"/><i>asist</i><par n="nommf__n"/></e>
